Rhode Island statutes. Title 33 Probate Practice and Procedure
Chapter 28 Elective Share

33-28-1.
Elective share.

The surviving spouse of a decedent who dies domiciled in this state has a right of election, under the limitations and conditions stated in this chapter, to take an elective share equal to:

The life estate and allowance in an intestate’s real estate titled in the name of the decedent individually at the time of the decedent’s death pursuant to §§

33-1-5

and

33-1-6

; and

The share of the decedent’s personal estate subject to probate pursuant to §

33-1-10

.

The elective share may be taken in kind or the value thereof.

If the right of election is exercised by, or on behalf of, the surviving spouse, the surviving spouse’s allowances pursuant to chapter 10 of this title, if any, are not charged against, but are in addition to, the elective share.

The right, if any, of the surviving spouse of a decedent who dies domiciled outside this state to take an elective share in property in this state is governed by the law of the decedent’s domicile at death.

History of Section.

P.L. 2014, ch. 260, § 4; P.L. 2014, ch. 312, § 4; P.L. 2018, ch. 149, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 235, § 1.

33-28-2.
Right of election personal to surviving spouse — Incapacitated surviving spouse.

The right of election may be exercised only by a surviving spouse who is living when the petition for the elective share is filed in the probate court pursuant to §

33-28-4(a)

. If the election is not exercised by the surviving spouse personally, it may be exercised on the surviving spouse’s behalf by the surviving spouse’s conservator, guardian, or agent under the authority of a power of attorney.

If the election is exercised on behalf of a surviving spouse who is an incapacitated person, the probate court may authorize transfer of property in kind, or payment of the value thereof, to the spouse’s personal representative upon such terms and conditions as the court determines to be in the spouse’s best interest.

History of Section.

P.L. 2014, ch. 260, § 4; P.L. 2014, ch. 312, § 4.

33-28-3.
Waiver of right to elect and of other rights.

The right of election of a surviving spouse and the rights of the surviving spouse to allowances pursuant to chapter 10 of this title may be waived, wholly or partially, before or after marriage, by a written contract, agreement, or waiver signed by the surviving spouse. The written contract, agreement, or waiver is enforceable without consideration.

A surviving spouse’s waiver is not enforceable if the surviving spouse proves that: (1) The surviving spouse did not execute the waiver voluntarily; or (2) The waiver was unconscionable when it was executed and, before execution of the waiver, the surviving spouse: (i) Was not provided a fair and reasonable disclosure of the property or financial obligations of the decedent; (ii) Did not voluntarily and expressly waive, in writing, any right to disclosure of the property or financial obligations of the decedent beyond the disclosure provided; and (iii) Did not have, or reasonably could not have had, an adequate knowledge of the property or financial obligations of the decedent.

An issue of unconscionability of a waiver is for decision by the probate court or other court of competent jurisdiction as a matter of law.

Unless it provides to the contrary, a waiver of “all rights” or equivalent language in the property or estate of a present or prospective spouse or a complete property settlement entered into after, or in anticipation of, separation or divorce is a waiver of all rights to elective share and allowances pursuant to chapter 10 of this title by each spouse in the property of the other and a renunciation by each of all benefits that would otherwise pass to that spouse from the other by intestate succession or by virtue of any will executed before the waiver or property settlement.

History of Section.

P.L. 2014, ch. 260, § 4; P.L. 2014, ch. 312, § 4.

33-28-4.
Proceeding for elective share — Time limit.

If any estate, real or personal, be devised or bequeathed to a surviving spouse, the devise or bequest shall bar the elective share unless the surviving spouse shall, within six (6) months after the date of the first publication of the qualifications of the fiduciary of the estate of the deceased spouse, file in the probate court a written statement waiving and renouncing the devise and bequest and petitioning for the elective share. If any of the deceased spouse’s real estate is located in any city or town other than that in which the will of the decedent is probated, the waiver and petition shall also be filed in the records of deeds in each city and town where the real estate is located. The surviving spouse shall give notice of the time and place set for hearing to persons interested in the estate and to those whose interests will be adversely affected by the taking of the elective share.

Within six (6) months after the date of the first publication of the qualifications of the fiduciary of the estate of the deceased spouse, the surviving spouse may petition the probate court for an extension of time for making an election not to exceed nine (9) months after the decedent’s death, upon notice of the time and place set for hearing, to persons interested in the estate and to those whose interests will be adversely affected by the taking of the elective share.

The surviving spouse may withdraw a waiver and petition for an elective share at any time before entry of a final determination by the probate court.

The order or judgment of the probate court may be enforced as necessary in suit for contribution or payment in other courts of this state or other jurisdictions.

History of Section.

P.L. 2014, ch. 260, § 4; P.L. 2014, ch. 312, § 4.